Utah statutes.
10-8-53.5.   Regulation of carbon monoxide detectors -- Enforcement against
occupant only.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a municipality may not enforce an ordinance,
rule, or regulation requiring the installation or maintenance of a carbon
monoxide detector in a residential dwelling against anyone other than the
occupant of the dwelling.
(2)  Subsection (1) may not be construed to affect:
(a)  a building permit applicant's obligation to comply with a building code
that requires the installation of a carbon monoxide detector as part of new
construction; or
(b)  a municipality's ability to require a building permit applicant to comply
with a building code that requires the installation of a carbon monoxide
detector as part of new construction.
